Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 12 Conveyances
18-12-401. Deed between spouses.

(a)

A deed of conveyance of real property located in this state executed after the passage of this act by an individual to his or her spouse shall convey to the grantee named in the deed the entire interest of the grantor in the property conveyed, or the interest specified in the deed, as if the spousal relation did not exist between the parties to the deed.

(b)(1)

All deeds of conveyance of real property in this state executed before the passage of this act by an individual to his or her spouse shall convey to the respective grantees in the deeds the full and entire interests of the respective grantors in the deeds, or the interests specified in the deeds respectively, as if the spousal relation had not existed between the parties to the deeds.

(2)

This subsection does not apply to a deed that has been construed by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(c)

The word “deed” as used in this section includes instruments of writing affecting, or purporting to affect, the title to real property, either by way of conveyance or encumbrance.

(d)

The purpose of this section is to empower an individual to contract with his or her spouse in regard to real property in the same manner and to the same effect as if the spousal relation did not exist between the parties to the deed.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 86, §§ 1-3; Pope's Dig., §§ 1866-1868; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-413, 50-413n, 50-414; Acts 2019, No. 387, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “passage of this act,” Acts 1935, No. 86, was signed by the Governor on March 2, 1935, and took effect on June 13, 1935.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “an individual to his or her spouse” for “a married man directly to his wife or by a married woman directly to her husband, substituted “convey” for “be construed as conveying”, deleted “as fully and to all intents and purposes” preceding “as if”, and substituted “spousal” for “marital”; in (b)(1), substituted “convey” for “be construed as conveying”, and deleted “as fully and to all intents and purposes” following “respectively”; substituted “does not apply” for “shall not be construed as applying” in (b)(2); substituted “includes” for “shall be construed to include any and all” in (c); in (d), substituted “an individual to contract with his or her spouse” for “married men to contract with their wives and married women to contract with their husbands”, substituted “the same” for “like”, and substituted “the spousal relation did not exist between the parties to the deed” for “married men and married women were unmarried”; and made stylistic changes.

18-12-402. Relinquishment of dower or curtesy in spouse's land.

A married person may relinquish dower or curtesy in any of the real estate of a spouse by joining with the spouse in the deed of conveyance thereof, or by a separate instrument executed to spouse's grantee or anyone claiming title under the spouse, and acknowledging it in the manner prescribed by law.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, § 11; Acts 1919, No. 324, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 1506; Pope's Dig., § 1815; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-416.

18-12-403. Conveyance, etc., of homestead.

No conveyance, mortgage, or other instrument affecting the homestead of any married person shall be of any validity, except for taxes, laborers' and mechanics' liens, and purchase money, unless his or her spouse joins in the execution of the instrument, or conveys by separate document, and acknowledges it.

History.

Acts 1887, No. 64, § 1, p. 90; C. & M. Dig., § 5542; Pope's Dig., § 7181; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-415; Acts 1993, No. 1164, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1164, § 2, provided:

“Conveyances, mortgages and other instruments affecting the homestead of married persons which were executed prior to the effective date of this act shall not be deemed invalid solely because the spouses failed to sign and acknowledge the same document.”

Cross References.

Validation of instruments not complying with this section, §16-47-108.

18-12-404. Conveyance of interest of husband with mental illness and guardian appointed — Relinquishment of dower.

In all cases under §20-47-103 whereunder a husband is duly adjudged to be with mental illness and a guardian appointed and wherein the guardian makes a sale of the husband's interest in any of the real estate belonging to his ward, and the wife of the husband with mental illness is entitled to dower, it shall be sufficient to pass the dower interest of the wife, if she shall duly join in the petition of the guardian for the sale, and by separate instrument, duly acknowledged, convey all her interest in the lands.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 325, § 1.

Subchapter 5

— Power of Attorney

Cross References.

Durable power of attorney, §28-68-201 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1939, No. 27, § 3: approved Jan. 31, 1939. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared that many titles to lands, timber, oil and gas leases, and mineral rights, within the state of Arkansas are clouded, and that much confusion exists on account thereof, by reason of doubt as to the validity and effect of a married woman's power of attorney to relinquish her dower and homestead rights in her husband's land and as to the validity and effect of the act of her agent and attorney in fact in so relinquishing her dower and homestead according thereto, thus retarding development of the resources of the state in many instances, and an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and it being necessary for the preservation of public peace, health and safety, that this measure become effective without delay; it shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1981, No. 714, § 75: Mar. 25, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to such matters as homestead, dower, curtesy, statutory allowances payable from a decedent's estate, and the right of a surviving spouse to take against the will of a decedent, do not in all circumstances provide for equal treatment between the sexes, that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides equality in the property rights and interests of married persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

18-12-501. Acknowledgment and recording.

(a)

Every letter of attorney, containing a power to convey any real estate as agent or attorney for the owner thereof or to execute as agent or attorney for another any deed or instrument in writing, that shall convey any real estate, or whereby any real estate shall be affected in law or equity, shall be acknowledged or proved and certified and recorded with any deed that the agent or attorney shall make in virtue of the letter of attorney.

(b)

Letters of attorney shall be proved or acknowledged before the same courts or officers that are authorized by this act to take probate of deeds conveying real estate.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, §§ 23, 24; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1527, 1528; Pope's Dig., §§ 1837, 1838; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-422, 50-423.

Meaning of “this act”.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, codified as §§16-47-101,16-47-103 —16-47-106,16-47-110,18-12-101,18-12-102,18-12-104,18-12-105,18-12-201,18-12-203 —18-12-206,18-12-209,18-12-301,18-12-402,18-12-501,18-12-502,18-12-601 —18-12-603.

18-12-502. Revocation.

(a)(1)

No letter of attorney, duly acknowledged or proved and certified as prescribed by this act, shall be revoked but by the maker of the letter of attorney or his or her legal representatives.

(2)

The revocation shall be in writing acknowledged or proved before the proper court or officer and filed for record in the county or counties where the letter of attorney was intended to operate.

(b)

All such letters of attorney shall be revoked and deemed void from the time of filing revocations for record.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, § 25; C. & M. Dig., § 1529; Pope's Dig., § 1839; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-424.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §18-12-501.

18-12-503. Relinquishment of dower, curtesy, and homestead rights.

(a)

By joining with his or her spouse in the execution of power of attorney, or by separate instrument, a married person may appoint an agent or attorney in fact and authorize him or her, for and in the person's name and stead, to relinquish all rights and possibility of dower, curtesy, and homestead to a spouse's grantee, lessee, or mortgagee in any lands, oil, gas, mineral, or timber and to execute for the person such relinquishment of dower, curtesy, and homestead in any oil and gas lease or assignment thereof, mineral deed, timber deed, royalty contract, mortgage, or contract for the sale of any land, timber, or minerals, or any interest therein, owned by a spouse and conveyed by the spouse to the grantee.

(b)(1)

The act of an agent or attorney in fact, when authorized by properly executed and recorded power of attorney, in so relinquishing dower, curtesy, and homestead of a married person by joining in any deed, lease, conveyance of minerals, royalty contract, or other contract for the sale of any lands or lease of any lands for developing its minerals, or any interest therein, or the assignment of any oil and gas lease or interest therein shall be as effectual and binding as if the instrument or instruments had been executed in the first instance by the married person.

(2)

The relinquishment by the attorney in fact may be by separate instrument or by the attorney in fact joining with the spouse in the execution of one (1) or more conveyances.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 27, § 1; 1981, No. 714, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-425.

Publisher's Notes.

As to validation of prior powers of attorney authorizing relinquishment of dower and homestead rights, see Acts 1939, No. 27, § 2.

Subchapter 6

— Miscellaneous Conveyances

Effective Dates.

Acts 1853, p. 207, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1919, No. 444, § 2: Mar. 27, 1919. Emergency declared.

Acts 1927, No. 224, § 2: approved Mar. 23, 1927. Emergency clause provided: “This act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared and all laws and parts of laws in conflict herewith are hereby repealed and this act shall take effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 2005, No. 2270, § 2: Apr. 14, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the titles to real property rights purchased at delinquent tax sales are not marketable; that the inability to receive marketable title to real property is an unreasonable alienation of real property and harmful to the economy; and that this act will permit the marketability of real property rights purchased at delinquent tax sales for the good of the state and its citizens. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

18-12-601. After-acquired title.

If any person shall convey any real estate by deed purporting to convey it in fee simple absolute, or any less estate, and shall not at the time of the conveyance have the legal estate in the lands, but shall afterwards acquire it, then the legal or equitable estate afterwards acquired shall immediately pass to the grantee and the conveyance shall be as valid as if the legal or equitable estate had been in the grantor at the time of the conveyance.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 1498; Pope's Dig., § 1798; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-404.

18-12-602. Land in adverse possession.

Any person claiming title to any real estate, notwithstanding there may be an adverse possession thereof, may sell and convey his or her interest in the same manner and with like effect as if he or she were in the actual possession of the real estate.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, § 6; C. & M. Dig., § 1500; Pope's Dig., § 1809; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-408.

18-12-603. Grants to two or more as tenancy in common.

Every interest in real estate granted or devised to two (2) or more persons, other than executors and trustees as such, shall be in tenancy in common unless expressly declared in the grant or devise to be a joint tenancy.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, § 9; C. & M. Dig., § 1503; Pope's Dig., § 1812; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-411.

18-12-604. Deed to trustee or agent.

(a)(1)

The appearance of the words “trustee”, “as trustee”, or “agent” following the names of the grantee in any deed of conveyance of land executed, without other language showing a trust, shall not be deemed to give notice to, or put on inquiry, any person dealing with the land that a trust or agency exists or that there are other beneficiaries of the conveyance except the grantee named therein.

(2)

The conveyance shall vest the title to the land in the grantee.

(b)

A conveyance of land by the grantee, whether followed by the words “trustee”, “as trustee”, or “agent” or not, shall vest title in his or her grantee free from any claims of all persons or corporations.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 444, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 1504; Pope's Dig., § 1813; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-412.

18-12-605. Deeds of administrators, executors, guardians, commissioners, and sheriffs.

(a)(1)

All deeds of conveyance made by an administrator, an executor, a guardian, or a commissioner, deeds of real estate sold under an execution made and executed by a sheriff, and deeds made and executed by a trustee or an attorney pursuant to a foreclosure of a deed of trust or mortgage, duly made and executed, acknowledged, and recorded, as now required by law and purporting to convey real estate, shall vest in the grantee and his or her heirs and assigns a good and valid title, both in law and in equity.

(2)(A)

The deeds shall be evidence of the facts recited in the deeds and of the legality and regularity of the sale of the real estate so conveyed.

(B)

However, the deeds do not warrant title to a subsequent grantee, and any subsequent grantee may not assert or claim any warranty of title deriving from the deeds.

(b)

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a deed made under subdivision (a)(1) of this section from warranting title by express use of warranty language.

(c)

Every deed so made, executed, acknowledged, and recorded, or a certified copy of the deed, under the seal of the recorder of the proper county shall be received in evidence in any court in this state without further proof of its execution.

History.

Acts 1853, §§ 1, 2, p. 207; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1534, 1535; Pope's Dig., §§ 1844, 1845; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-419, 50-420; Acts 2005, No. 1884, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment redesignated former (a) as present (a)(1) and (a)(2)(A); added present (a)(2)(B) and (b); redesignated former (b) as present (c); inserted “and deeds made and executed by a trustee or an attorney pursuant to a foreclosure of a deed of trust or mortgage” in present (a)(1); and deleted “until the contrary is made to appear” from the end of present (a)(2)(A).

18-12-606. Deed or patent by Governor.

(a)

In all cases in which, by the laws of this state, the Governor is required to execute any deed of conveyance or patent for any lands sold or granted by the state, the deed of conveyance or patent, when executed by the Governor and countersigned by the Secretary of State, and when the seal of the state shall be affixed thereto, shall convey all the right and title of the state in and to the lands to the purchaser.

(b)(1)

The deed may be recorded in the office of the recorder of the proper county and shall have the same effect as evidence.

(2)

A duly certified transcript of the deed or patent taken from the record thereof shall have the same effect as evidence in all the courts in this state as if the deed or patent had been acknowledged and recorded under the existing laws of this state.

History.

Acts 1850, § 1, p. 65; C. & M. Dig., § 1533; Pope's Dig., § 1843; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-421.

Publisher's Notes.

The power to dispose of state lands is now vested in the Commissioner of State Lands pursuant to §22-5-206.

18-12-607. Sales of real estate by defunct corporations ratified.

(a)

All sales of real estate which was the property of any corporation organized under the laws of the State of Arkansas, when the corporation has expired or ceased to exist, either by limitations, judgment of court, forfeiture of its charter, legislative act, or by surrender of charter, are ratified and declared to be binding and to pass to the purchaser at the sales all the right, title, and interest the corporation has in the real estate at the time of its dissolution and to pass to the purchaser all the right, title, and interest in the State of Arkansas, as trustee, as now provided by law.

(b)(1)

The deed of conveyance shall have been executed by the proper officers of the corporation at the time of its dissolution or, in the event of their death, absence from the state, or inability to act, the resident stockholders of the corporation shall have a right to select a president and secretary for the purpose of executing and delivering the deed of conveyance.

(2)

When so executed, the deed shall have the same force and effect as if executed by the proper officers of the corporation prior to the dissolution thereof.

History.

Acts 1927, No. 224, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 1865; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-426.

18-12-608. Beneficiary deeds — Terms — Recording required.

(a)(1)(A)

A beneficiary deed is a deed without current tangible consideration that conveys upon the death of the owner an ownership interest in real property other than a leasehold or lien interest to a grantee designated by the owner and that expressly states that the deed is not to take effect until the death of the owner.

(B)(i)

A beneficiary deed transfers the interest to the designated grantee effective upon the death of the owner, subject to:

(a)

All conveyances, assignments, contracts, leases, mortgages, deeds of trust, liens, security pledges, oil, gas, or mineral leases, and other encumbrances made by the owner or to which the real property was subject at the time of the owner's death, whether or not the conveyance or encumbrance was created before or after the execution of the beneficiary deed; and

(b)

A claim for reimbursement of federal or state benefits by the Department of Human Services from the estate of the grantor or the interest acquired by a grantee of the beneficiary deed under §20-76-436.

(ii)

No legal or equitable interest shall vest in the grantee until the death of the owner prior to revocation of the beneficiary deed.

(2)(A)

The owner may designate multiple grantees under a beneficiary deed.

(B)

Multiple grantees may be joint tenants with right of survivorship, tenants in common, holders of a tenancy by the entirety, or any other tenancy that is otherwise valid under the laws of this state.

(3)(A)

The owner may designate one (1) or more successor grantees, including one (1) or more unnamed heirs of the original grantee or grantees, under a beneficiary deed.

(B)

The condition upon which the interest of a successor grantee vests, such as the failure of the original grantee to survive the grantor, shall be included in the beneficiary deed.

(b)(1)

If real property is owned as a tenancy by the entirety or as a joint tenancy with the right of survivorship, a beneficiary deed that conveys an interest in the real property to a grantee designated by all of the then surviving owners and that expressly states the beneficiary deed is not to take effect until the death of the last surviving owner transfers the interest to the designated grantee effective upon the death of the last surviving owner.

(2)(A)

If a beneficiary deed is executed by fewer than all of the owners of real property owned as a tenancy by the entirety or as joint tenants with right of survivorship, the beneficiary deed is valid if the last surviving owner is a person who executed the beneficiary deed.

(B)

If the last surviving owner did not execute the beneficiary deed, the beneficiary deed is invalid.

(c)(1)

A beneficiary deed is valid only if the beneficiary deed is recorded before the death of the owner or the last surviving owner as provided by law in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the real property is located.

(2)

A beneficiary deed may be used to transfer an interest in real property to a trustee of a trust estate even if the trust is revocable and may include one (1) or more unnamed successor trustees as successor grantees.

(d)(1)

A beneficiary deed may be revoked at any time by the owner or, if there is more than one (1) owner, by any of the owners who executed the beneficiary deed.

(2)

To be effective, the revocation shall be:

(A)

Executed before the death of the owner who executes the revocation; and

(B)

Recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the real property is located before the death of the owner as provided by law.

(3)

If the revocation is not executed by all the owners, the revocation is not effective unless executed by the last surviving owner and recorded before the death of the last surviving owner.

(4)

A beneficiary deed that complies with this section may not be revoked, altered, or amended by the provisions of the owner's will.

(e)

If an owner executes more than one (1) beneficiary deed concerning the same real property, the recorded beneficiary deed that is last signed before the owner's death is the effective beneficiary deed, regardless of the sequence of recording.

(f)(1)

This section does not prohibit other methods of conveying real property that are permitted by law and that have the effect of postponing enjoyment of an interest in real property until the death of the owner.

(2)

This section does not invalidate any deed otherwise effective by law to convey title to the interests and estates provided in the deed that is not recorded until after the death of the owner.

(g)

A beneficiary deed is sufficient if it complies with other applicable laws and if it is in substantially the following form:

“Beneficiary Deed CAUTION: THIS DEED MUST BE RECORDED PRIOR TO THE DEATH OF THE GRANTOR IN ORDER TO BE EFFECTIVE. KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS THAT: For a non-monetary, intangible consideration, of value to the Grantor, I (we) hereby convey to
(grantee) effective on my (our) death the following described real property: (Legal description) (Signature of grantor(s)) (acknowledgment)”

Click to view form.

(h)

The instrument of revocation shall be sufficient if it complies with other applicable laws and is in substantially the following form:

“Revocation of Beneficiary Deed CAUTION: THIS REVOCATION MUST BE RECORDED PRIOR TO THE DEATH OF THE GRANTOR IN ORDER TO BE EFFECTIVE. The undersigned hereby revokes the beneficiary deed recorded on
(date), in docket or book
at page
, or instrument number
, records of
County, Arkansas. Dated:
Signature (acknowledgment)”

Click to view form.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1918, § 1; 2007, No. 243, § 1.

18-12-609. Marketability of real property sold at tax sales.

(a)

The title to any real property located within the State of Arkansas based upon a deed resulting from a delinquent tax sale is marketable if:

(1)

The tax deed has been of record for more than fifteen (15) years;

(2)

Any taxes due have been paid by the tax deed grantee or the heirs or successors of the tax deed grantee for more than fifteen (15) years;

(3)

No claim of adverse possession of the real property has been asserted or filed of record since the recording of the tax deed; and

(4)

The taxes for which the tax deed was issued had not been paid before the tax deed was executed and delivered to the tax deed grantee.

(b)

This section shall not be subject to the additional time to challenge a tax deed given to minors, persons suffering a mental incapacity, or persons serving in the United States Armed Forces during a time of war under §26-37-203(b).

(c)(1)

Nothing in this section shall preclude a judicial action to confirm a tax sale or quiet the title to any real property located within this state prior to the time that the title to the real property is considered marketable under subsection (a) of this section.

(2)

A judicial action to confirm the tax sale or quiet title to real property located in this state eliminates any additional time to redeem the real property or challenge a tax deed under §26-37-203 or §26-37-305.

(d)

This section shall not apply to a tax sale of a severed mineral interest.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2270, § 1; 2015, No. 683, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added the (c)(1) designation; inserted “confirm a tax sale or” in (c)(1); and added (c)(2).

Subchapter 7

— Disbursement of Funds as Part of Real Estate Closing and Settlement Services Act

18-12-701. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Disbursement of Funds as Part of Real Estate Closing and Settlement Services Act”.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1110, § 1.

18-12-702. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Available for immediate withdrawal as a matter of right” means the following:

(A)

For any item or draft, when the item or draft has been submitted for collection and payment received; and

(B)

For any deposited item or draft, when final settlement has occurred;

(2)

“Closing and settlement services” means those services which benefit the parties to the sale, lease, encumbrance, mortgage, or creation of a secured interest in and to real property, and the receipt and disbursement of money in connection with any sale, lease, encumbrance, mortgage, or deed of trust; and

(3)

“Financial institution” means an entity that is authorized under the laws of this state, another state, or the United States of America to make loans and receive deposits and has its deposits insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1110, § 1.

18-12-703. Closing and settlement services — Disbursement of funds — Penalties.

(a)(1)

No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity that provides closing and settlement services for a real estate transaction shall disburse funds as a part of such services until those funds have been received and are available for immediate withdrawal as a matter of right from the financial institution in which the funds have been deposited.

(2)

However, the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity providing closing and settlement services may advance funds, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), on behalf of interested parties for the transaction, to pay incidental fees and charges pertaining to the closing and settlement of the transaction.

(b)

Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity who knowingly and willfully violates the provisions of this subchapter shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

(c)

In addition to the criminal penalty imposed by this section, the prosecuting attorneys of this state shall have the authority to file a petition in circuit court in any county in which a violation of the provisions of this subchapter occurred, for civil enforcement of the provisions of this subchapter by seeking an injunction prohibiting any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity from disbursing funds in violation of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1110, § 1.

Cross References.

Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.